Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko H.F. 59 DIVISION I 1 GROCER REINVESTMENT AND LOCAL PRODUCE PROCESSING 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.413 Grocer reinvestment program. 3 1. As used in this section: 4 a. âFinancial assistanceâ means assistance, in the form 5 of grants, provided only from the funds and assets legally 6 available to the authority pursuant to this section. 7 b. âGrocery storeâ means an establishment also known as a 8 supermarket that primarily engages in retailing a general line 9 of food including canned and frozen food; fresh fruits and 10 vegetables; and fresh and prepared meat, fish, and poultry. 11 c. âLow or moderate income communityâ means a census tract, 12 as reported by the most recent federal decennial census, in 13 which fifty-one percent of the persons residing in the census 14 tract are at or below eighty percent of the area median income 15 as determined by the United States department of housing and 16 urban development. 17 d. âProgramâ means the grocer reinvestment program. 18 e. âUnderserved communityâ means a census tract, as reported 19 in the most recent federal decennial census, determined to 20 be an area with low grocery store access as identified in 21 the food access research atlas prepared by the United States 22 department of agriculture, or by a methodology adopted by 23 another governmental healthy food initiative. 24 2. The authority shall establish and administer the program 25 for the purpose of awarding financial assistance to eligible 26 grocery stores for the following projects at existing grocery 27 stores, or new grocery stores to be located in this state: 28 a. Capital improvements to establish or expand capacity, 29 including expansions and modifications. 30 b. Upgrades to utilities, including water, electric, heat, 31 refrigeration, and freezing units. 32 c. Purchases of equipment and furnishings. 33 d. Expenditures for professional services. 34 e. Technology that allows increased capacity or business 35 -1- LSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 8 H.F. 59 resilience, including software and hardware related to business 1 functions, logistics, inventory management, temperature 2 monitoring controls, cybersecurity, and internet site design 3 that enables electronic commerce. 4 3. The authority shall establish eligibility criteria for 5 the program by rule. The eligibility criteria must include all 6 of the following: 7 a. The grocery store has filed all required documents with 8 the secretary of state under the relevant filing statute as 9 described in section 9.11. 10 b. The grocery store is organized as a sole proprietorship, 11 partnership, limited liability company, corporation, 12 cooperative, nonprofit organization, or nonprofit community 13 development entity. 14 c. The grocery store owns five or fewer grocery stores. 15 d. The grocery store has the capacity to successfully 16 implement or complete the project, and demonstrates a plan for 17 sustainability. 18 4. In order to be awarded financial assistance under the 19 program, a grocery store must provide matching funds for the 20 project equal to the amount of the financial assistance award. 21 Financial assistance awarded under the program shall not exceed 22 two hundred thousand dollars. 23 5. The authority shall evaluate applications, and priority 24 shall be given to the grocery stores that commit to all of the 25 following: 26 a. Locating the project in an underserved community that 27 primarily serves the residents of low or moderate income 28 communities. 29 b. Accepting benefits under the United States department 30 of agriculture supplemental nutrition assistance program and 31 the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, 32 and children. 33 c. Creating or retaining jobs for local residents. 34 d. Making efforts to procure and offer local foods for sale. 35 -2- LSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko 2/ 8 H.F. 59 e. Other criteria determined by the authority. 1 6. By November 1, 2026, and each November 1 thereafter, 2 if financial assistance has been provided in the immediately 3 preceding fiscal year, the director shall submit a report to 4 the general assembly describing the activities of the program 5 including the geographic distribution of the projects, the 6 identity of the applicants, and the new investments or new jobs 7 created as a result of the financial assistance provided under 8 the program. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 15.414 Local produce processing grant 10 program. 11 1. As used in this section: 12 a. âLocal produceâ means fruits and vegetables grown in this 13 state. 14 b. âLocal produce and processingâ means the preparation of 15 local produce for human consumption. 16 2. a. The authority shall establish and administer 17 the local produce processing grant program for the purpose 18 of awarding grants to Iowa-based entities to increase the 19 availability of local produce processing. In administering the 20 program, the authority shall prioritize grants to Iowa-based 21 entities that will increase any of the following as it relates 22 to local produce processing: 23 (1) Availability. 24 (2) Access. 25 (3) Efficiency. 26 (4) Capacity. 27 b. A grant shall not be awarded to an entity unless the 28 local produce processing includes local produce from multiple 29 Iowa-based farms. 30 3. The authority may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 31 administer this section. 32 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 15.415 Grocer reinvestment and local 33 food processing fund. 34 1. a. A grocer reinvestment and local food processing 35 -3- LSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko 3/ 8 H.F. 59 fund is created in the state treasury under the control of 1 the authority. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated 2 to the authority and any other moneys available to, obtained 3 by, or accepted by the authority for placement in the fund. 4 The fund shall be used to award financial assistance as 5 provided under the grocer reinvestment program established in 6 section 15.413 and the local produce processing grant program 7 established in section 15.414. 8 b. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 9 and each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred thousand dollars 10 of the annual appropriation to the fund, or ten percent of the 11 moneys in the fund available on July 1, whichever is less, 12 shall be allocated to the local produce processing grant 13 program established in section 15.414. 14 c. The authority may use not more than five percent of 15 the moneys in the fund at the beginning of the fiscal year 16 for purposes of administrative costs, marketing, technical 17 assistance, and other program support. 18 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 19 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the 20 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 21 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 22 the succeeding fiscal year. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 23 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 24 to the fund. 25 DIVISION II 26 LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM ââ GROCERY STORES 27 Sec. 4. Section 267A.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 1. The purpose of this chapter is to empower farmers , and 30 food entrepreneurs , and grocery stores to provide for strong 31 local food economies that promote self-sufficiency and job 32 growth in the agricultural sector and allied sectors of the 33 economy. 34 Sec. 5. Section 267A.1, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 35 -4- LSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko 4/ 8 H.F. 59 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 d. Increase the number of jobs in this stateâs farm and 2 business economies associated with producing, processing, 3 distributing, retailing, and marketing local food. 4 Sec. 6. Section 267A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Increase the availability and viability 7 of grocery stores in this state. 8 Sec. 7. Section 267A.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âGrocery storeâ means the same as 11 defined in section 15.413. 12 Sec. 8. Section 267A.6, subsection 2, paragraphs a and c, 13 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 14 a. Improve communication and cooperation between and among 15 farmers, food entrepreneurs, grocers, and consumers. 16 c. Demonstrate the value of processing, distributing, 17 retailing, and marketing local foods. A demonstration project 18 must be capable of being replicated on a statewide basis. 19 DIVISION III 20 APPROPRIATIONS 21 Sec. 9. GROCER REINVESTMENT FUND ââ FY 2025-2026. There 22 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 23 economic development authority for the fiscal year beginning 24 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 25 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 26 designated: 27 For deposit in the grocer reinvestment and local food 28 processing fund created in section 15.415: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 30 Sec. 10. GROCER REINVESTMENT FUND ââ FY 2026-2027. There 31 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 32 economic development authority for the fiscal year beginning 33 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 34 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -5- LSB 1325YH (4) 91 nls/ko 5/ 8 H.F. 59 designated: 1 For deposit in the grocer reinvestment and local food 2 processing fund created in section 15.415: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 4